Florida, session 2026, SB322.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 55 56 Section 1.âPresent subsections (4) through (8), (9), (10), 57 and (11) through (18) of section 83.43, Florida Statutes, are 58 redesignated as subsections (5) through (9), (11), (12), and 59 (14) through (21), respectively, and new subsections (4), (10) 60 and (13) are added to that section, to read: 61 83.43âDefinitions.âAs used in this part, the following 62 words and terms shall have the following meanings unless some 63 other meaning is plainly indicated: 64 (4)ââCooling equipmentâ means a permanently installed or 65 securely affixed appliance designed to cool indoor air, 66 including a central air-conditioning system, a packaged terminal 67 air-conditioning unit, a mini-split heat pump, or a window air 68 conditioning unit, where permitted by applicable code. 69 (10)ââHabitable spaceâ has the same meaning as in the 70 Florida Building Code. 71 (13)ââOutdoor heat indexâ means the apparent temperature 72 derived from ambient air temperature and relative humidity as 73 reported by the National Weather Service for the nearest 74 reporting station. 75 Section 2.âPresent subsections (3) and (4) of section 76 83.51, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (4) and 77 (5), respectively, a new subsection (3) is added to that 78 section, and paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of that section is 79 amended, to read: 80 83.51âLandlordâs obligation to maintain premises.â 81 (2)(a)âUnless otherwise agreed in writing, in addition to 82 the requirements of subsection (1), the landlord of a dwelling 83 unit other than a single-family home or duplex shall, at all 84 times during the tenancy, make reasonable provisions for: 85 1.âThe extermination of rats, mice, roaches, ants, wood 86 destroying organisms, and bedbugs. If the tenant must vacate the 87 premises for such extermination, the landlord is not liable for 88 damages but must abate the rent. The landlord must provide 7 89 daysâ written notice, in person, by mail, or by e-mail in 90 accordance with s. 83.505, to the tenant if the tenant must 91 temporarily vacate the premises for extermination pursuant to 92 this subparagraph. A tenant is only required to vacate the 93 premises for a period of time not to exceed 4 days. 94 2.âLocks and keys. 95 3.âThe clean and safe condition of common areas. 96 4.âGarbage removal and outside receptacles therefor. 97 5.âFunctioning facilities for heat during winter, running 98 water, and hot water. 99 6.âFunctioning facilities for cooling. Such facilities must 100 consist of cooling equipment that is able to maintain indoor air 101 temperature of 82 degrees Fahrenheit or lower in habitable 102 spaces when the outdoor heat index reaches or exceeds 90 degrees 103 Fahrenheit. Compliance may be achieved through central air 104 conditioning, a packaged terminal air-conditioner, a mini-split 105 heat pump, or a window air-conditioning unit that meets 106 manufacturer installation requirements and that is permitted by 107 applicable code. The landlord shall repair or replace cooling 108 equipment within 3 business days after receiving written notice 109 from the tenant that the cooling equipment is defective or that 110 the indoor air temperature exceeds 82 degrees in habitable 111 spaces, unless the landlord is delayed by supply chain shortages 112 or interruptions. 113 (3)(a)âA landlord is not in violation of subparagraph 114 (2)(a)6. during any period in which: 115 1.âThe tenant unreasonably denies the landlord access to 116 the premises for installation, inspection, or repair of cooling 117 equipment; or 118 2.âThe cooling equipment is temporarily out of service due 119 to a casualty event or a utility outage not caused by the 120 landlord, provided the landlord commences repairs within 48 121 hours after the end of such event and diligently pursues 122 completion of such repairs. 123 (b)âThis act does not require cooling equipment where 124 prohibited by a local historic preservation ordinance or other 125 law; however, alternative code-compliant cooling solutions must 126 be provided where feasible. 127 (c)âThis act may not be construed to preempt or limit a 128 local government from adopting or enforcing more stringent 129 standards relating to functional facilities for cooling. 130 (d)âFor rental agreements in effect before July 1, 2026, a 131 landlord must comply with subparagraph (2)(a)6. no later than 132 July 1, 2027. 133 Section 3.âParagraphs (f) and (i) of subsection (3) of 134 section 489.105, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 135 489.105âDefinitions.âAs used in this part: 136 (3)ââContractorâ means the person who is qualified for, and 137 is only responsible for, the project contracted for and means, 138 except as exempted in this part, the person who, for 139 compensation, undertakes to, submits a bid to, or does himself 140 or herself or by others construct, repair, alter, remodel, add 141 to, demolish, subtract from, or improve any building or 142 structure, including related improvements to real estate, for 143 others or for resale to others; and whose job scope is 144 substantially similar to the job scope described in one of the 145 paragraphs of this subsection. For the purposes of regulation 146 under this part, the term âdemolishâ applies only to demolition 147 of steel tanks more than 50 feet in height; towers more than 50 148 feet in height; other structures more than 50 feet in height; 149 and all buildings or residences. Contractors are subdivided into 150 two divisions, Division I, consisting of those contractors 151 defined in paragraphs (a)-(c), and Division II, consisting of 152 those contractors defined in paragraphs (d)-(q): 153 (f)ââClass A air-conditioning contractorâ means a 154 contractor whose services are unlimited in the execution of 155 contracts requiring the experience, knowledge, and skill to do 156 all of the following: 157 1.âInstall, maintain, repair, fabricate, alter, extend, or 158 design, if not prohibited by law, central air-conditioning, 159 refrigeration, heating, and ventilating systems, including duct 160 work in connection with a complete system if such duct work is 161 performed by the contractor as necessary to complete an air 162 distribution system, boiler and unfired pressure vessel systems, 163 and all appurtenances, apparatus, or equipment used in 164 connection therewith, and any duct cleaning and equipment 165 sanitizing that requires at least a partial disassembling of the 166 system.; to 167 2.âInstall, maintain, repair, fabricate, alter, extend, or 168 design, if not prohibited by law, piping, insulation of pipes, 169 vessels and ducts, pressure and process piping, and pneumatic 170 control piping.; to 171 3.âReplace, disconnect, or reconnect power wiring on the 172 line or load side of the dedicated existing electrical 173 disconnect switch on single phase electrical systems.; to 174 4.âRepair or replace power wiring, disconnects, breakers, 175 or fuses for dedicated HVAC circuits with proper use of a 176 circuit breaker lock.; to 177 5.âInstall, disconnect, and reconnect low voltage heating, 178 ventilating, and air-conditioning control wiring.; and to 179 6.âInstall a condensate drain from an air-conditioning unit 180 to an existing safe waste or other approved disposal other than 181 a direct connection to a sanitary system. 182 7.âReplace and repair existing package pool heaters and 183 connect replacement package pool heaters to existing pool 184 piping. The replacement of an existing package pool heater must 185 use the same make and model as the existing package pool heater, 186 while also maintaining the flow rate, the connection points, and 187 the heater specifications without modifications to existing pool 188 piping or system components. The replacement or repair of an 189 existing package pool heater does not include any alteration to 190 the poolâs hydraulic system, the addition of bypass valves, the 191 installation of new plumbing, the rerouting of pipes, any change 192 to the poolâs circulation system, or any other modification 193 beyond what is necessary to disconnect and reconnect the unit to 194 the existing piping. 195 8.âPerform The scope of work for such contractor also 196 includes any excavation work incidental to work performed in 197 subparagraphs 1.-7., but not thereto, but does not include any 198 work such as liquefied petroleum or natural gas fuel lines 199 within buildings, except for disconnecting or reconnecting 200 changeouts of liquefied petroleum or natural gas appliances 201 within buildings; potable water lines or connections thereto; 202 sanitary sewer lines; swimming pool piping and filters; or 203 electrical power wiring. 204 9.âA Class A air-conditioning contractor may Test and 205 evaluate central air-conditioning, refrigeration, heating, and 206 ventilating systems, including duct work; however, a mandatory 207 licensing requirement is not established for the performance of 208 these specific services. 209 (i)ââMechanical contractorâ means a contractor whose 210 services are unlimited in the execution of contracts requiring 211 the experience, knowledge, and skill to do all of the following: 212 1.âInstall, maintain, repair, fabricate, alter, extend, or 213 design, if not prohibited by law, central air-conditioning, 214 refrigeration, heating, and ventilating systems, including duct 215 work in connection with a complete system if such duct work is 216 performed by the contractor as necessary to complete an air 217 distribution system, boiler and unfired pressure vessel systems, 218 lift station equipment and piping, and all appurtenances, 219 apparatus, or equipment used in connection therewith, and any 220 duct cleaning and equipment sanitizing that requires at least a 221 partial disassembling of the system.; to 222 2.âInstall, maintain, repair, fabricate, alter, extend, or 223 design, if not prohibited by law, piping, insulation of pipes, 224 vessels and ducts, pressure and process piping, pneumatic 225 control piping, gasoline tanks and pump installations and piping 226 for same, standpipes, air piping, vacuum line piping, oxygen 227 lines, nitrous oxide piping, ink and chemical lines, fuel 228 transmission lines, liquefied petroleum gas lines within 229 buildings, and natural gas fuel lines within buildings.; to 230 3.âReplace, disconnect, or reconnect power wiring on the 231 line or load side of the dedicated existing electrical 232 disconnect switch on single phase electrical systems.; to 233 4.âRepair or replace power wiring, disconnects, breakers, 234 or fuses for dedicated HVAC circuits with proper use of a 235 circuit breaker lock.; to 236 5.âInstall, disconnect, and reconnect low voltage heating, 237 ventilating, and air-conditioning control wiring.; and to 238 6.âInstall a condensate drain from an air-conditioning unit 239 to an existing safe waste or other approved disposal other than 240 a direct connection to a sanitary system. 241 7.âReplace and repair existing package pool heaters and 242 connect replacement package pool heaters to existing pool 243 piping. The replacement of an existing package pool heater must 244 use the same make and model as the existing package pool heater, 245 while also maintaining the flow rate, the connection points, and 246 the heater specifications without modifications to existing pool 247 piping or system components. The replacement or repair of an 248 existing package pool heater does not include any alteration to 249 the poolâs hydraulic system, the addition of bypass valves, the 250 installation of new plumbing, the rerouting of pipes, any change 251 to the poolâs circulation system, or any other modification 252 beyond what is necessary to disconnect and reconnect the unit to 253 the existing piping. 254 8.âPerform The scope of work for such contractor also 255 includes any excavation work incidental to work performed in 256 subparagraphs 1.-7., but not thereto, but does not include any 257 work such as potable water lines or connections thereto, 258 sanitary sewer lines, swimming pool piping and filters, or 259 electrical power wiring. 260 9.âA mechanical contractor may Test and evaluate central 261 air-conditioning, refrigeration, heating, and ventilating 262 systems, including duct work; however, a mandatory licensing 263 requirement is not established for the performance of these 264 specific services. 265 Section 4.âParagraph (b) of subsection (4) of section 266 489.115, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 267 489.115âCertification and registration; endorsement; 268 reciprocity; renewals; continuing education.â 269 (4) 270 (b)1.âEach certificateholder or registrant shall provide 271 proof, in a form established by rule of the board, that the 272 certificateholder or registrant has completed at least 14 273 classroom hours of at least 50 minutes each of continuing 274 education courses during each biennium since the issuance or 275 renewal of the certificate or registration. The board shall 276 establish by rule that a portion of the required 14 hours must 277 deal with the subject of workersâ compensation, business 278 practices, workplace safety, and, for applicable licensure 279 categories, wind mitigation methodologies, and 1 hour of which 280 must deal with laws and rules. The board shall by rule establish 281 criteria for the approval of continuing education courses and 282 providers, including requirements relating to the content of 283 courses and standards for approval of providers, and may by rule 284 establish criteria for accepting alternative nonclassroom 285 continuing education on an hour-for-hour basis. The board shall 286 prescribe by rule the continuing education, if any, which is 287 required during the first biennium of initial licensure. A 288 person who has been licensed for less than an entire biennium 289 must not be required to complete the full 14 hours of continuing 290 education. 291 2.âIn addition, the board may approve specialized 292 continuing education courses on compliance with the wind 293 resistance provisions for one and two family dwellings contained 294 in the Florida Building Code and any alternate methodologies for 295 providing such wind resistance which have been approved for use 296 by the Florida Building Commission. Division I 297 certificateholders or registrants who demonstrate proficiency 298 upon completion of such specialized courses may certify plans 299 and specifications for one and two family dwellings to be in 300 compliance with the code or alternate methodologies, as 301 appropriate, except for dwellings located in floodways or 302 coastal hazard areas as defined in ss. 60.3D and E of the 303 National Flood Insurance Program. 304 3.âThe board shall require, by rule adopted pursuant to ss. 305 120.536(1) and 120.54, a specified number of hours in 306 specialized or advanced module courses, approved by the Florida 307 Building Commission, on any portion of the Florida Building 308 Code, adopted pursuant to part IV of chapter 553, relating to 309 the contractorâs respective discipline. 310 4.a.âIn addition to courses offered by board-approved 311 providers, the board may award up to 4 hours of general 312 continuing education credit per renewal cycle for professional 313 association engagement that includes: 314 (I)âAttendance at an educational meeting, seminar, or 315 workshop conducted by a board-approved professional or trade 316 association relevant to the licenseeâs scope of practice, 317 consisting of at least 60 minutes of noncommercial technical 318 content or code, regulatory, safety, workforce, or business 319 practice content; or 320 (II)âDocumented service during the renewal cycle as a board 321 or standing-committee member of a board-approved professional or 322 trade association. 323 b.âCredit awarded under this subparagraph is general credit 324 only and may not be used to satisfy the requisite minimum hours 325 for specialized or advanced modules relating to the Florida 326 Building Code, workplace safety, workersâ compensation, business 327 practices, or wind-mitigation methodologies. 328 c.âThe board shall adopt rules to implement this 329 subparagraph, including, but not limited to, rules relating to: 330 (I)âDefinitions; 331 (II)âCriteria for professional or trade association 332 approval that includes all of the following: 333 (A)âAn identification of an associationâs nonprofit status. 334 (B)âA conflicts-of-interest policy. 335 (C)âAn evaluation of an associationâs published agendas 336 with identified educational content. 337 (D)âAccessibility of the trade associationâs information or 338 bylaws for nonmembers or guests; 339 (III)âAttendance verification for in-person and live 340 virtual formats; 341 (IV)âRecord retention and audit requirements; and 342 (V)âLimitations on the award of credits, restricting award 343 of such credits to not more than 2 hours per calendar day and 344 not more than 1 hour per meeting credited. 345 d.âA certificateholder or registrant may not receive credit 346 for time primarily devoted to marketing, sales presentations, or 347 association business unrelated to educational content. Approved 348 associations shall maintain rosters and supporting records for 4 349 years and submit attendance reports to the board in the format 350 prescribed by the department. 351 Section 5.âSubsection (6) of section 83.491, Florida 352 Statutes, is amended to read: 353 83.491âFee in lieu of security deposit.â 354 (6)âA fee collected under this section, or an insurance 355 product or a surety bond accepted, by a landlord in lieu of a 356 security deposit is not a security deposit as defined in s. 357 83.43(16) s. 83.43(13). 358 Section 6.âSubsection (1) of section 553.895, Florida 359 Statutes, is amended to read: 360 553.895âFiresafety.â 361 (1)âAny transient public lodging establishment, as defined 362 in chapter 509 and used primarily for transient occupancy as 363 defined in s. 83.43(21) s. 83.43(18), or any timeshare unit of a 364 timeshare plan as defined in chapters 718 and 721, which is of 365 three stories or more and for which the construction contract 366 has been let after September 30, 1983, with interior corridors 367 which do not have direct access from the guest area to exterior 368 means of egress and on buildings over 75 feet in height that 369 have direct access from the guest area to exterior means of 370 egress and for which the construction contract has been let 371 after September 30, 1983, must shall be equipped with an 372 automatic sprinkler system installed in compliance with the 373 provisions prescribed in the National Fire Protection 374 Association publication NFPA No. 13 (1985), âStandards for the 375 Installation of Sprinkler Systems.â Each guest room and each 376 timeshare unit shall be equipped with an approved listed single 377 station smoke detector meeting the minimum requirements of NFPA 378 74 (1984) âStandards for the Installation, Maintenance and Use 379 of Household Fire Warning Equipment,â powered from the building 380 electrical service, notwithstanding the number of stories in the 381 structure, if the contract for construction is let after 382 September 30, 1983. Single-station smoke detectors are shall not 383 be required when guest rooms or timeshare units contain smoke 384 detectors connected to a central alarm system which also alarms 385 locally. 386 Section 7.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 387 made by this act to section 489.105, Florida Statutes, in a 388 reference thereto, section 403.868, Florida Statutes, is 389 reenacted to read: 390 403.868âRequirements by a utility.âA utility may have more 391 stringent requirements than set by law, including certification 392 requirements for water distribution systems and domestic 393 wastewater collection systems operations, except that a utility 394 may not require a licensed contractor, as defined in s. 395 489.105(3) to have any additional license for work in water 396 distribution systems or domestic wastewater collection systems. 397 Section 8.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 398 made by this act to section 489.105, Florida Statutes, in a 399 reference thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (4) of section 400 489.107, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 401 489.107âConstruction Industry Licensing Board.â 402 (4)âThe board shall be divided into two divisions, Division 403 I and Division II. 404 (b)âDivision II is comprised of the roofing contractor, 405 sheet metal contractor, air-conditioning contractor, mechanical 406 contractor, pool contractor, plumbing contractor, and 407 underground utility and excavation contractor members of the 408 board; one of the members appointed pursuant to paragraph 409 (2)(j); and one of the members appointed pursuant to paragraph 410 (2)(k). Division II has jurisdiction over the regulation of 411 contractors defined in s. 489.105(3)(d)-(p). 412 Section 9.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 413 made by this act to section 489.105, Florida Statutes, in a 414 reference thereto, subsection (2) of section 489.113, Florida 415 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 416 489.113âQualifications for practice; restrictions.â 417 (2)âA person must be certified or registered in order to 418 engage in the business of contracting in this state. However, 419 for purposes of complying with the provisions of this chapter, a 420 subcontractor who is not certified or registered may perform 421 construction work under the supervision of a person who is 422 certified or registered, provided that the work is within the 423 scope of the supervising contractorâs license, the supervising 424 contractor is responsible for the work, and the subcontractor 425 being supervised is not engaged in construction work that would 426 require a license as a contractor under any of the categories 427 listed in s. 489.105(3)(d)-(o). This subsection does not affect 428 the application of any local construction licensing ordinances. 429 To enforce this subsection: 430 (a)âThe department shall issue a cease and desist order to 431 prohibit any person from engaging in the business of contracting 432 who does not hold the required certification or registration for 433 the work being performed under this part. For the purpose of 434 enforcing a cease and desist order, the department may file a 435 proceeding in the name of the state seeking issuance of an 436 injunction or a writ of mandamus against any person who violates 437 any provision of such order. 438 (b)âA county, municipality, or local licensing board 439 created by special act may issue a cease and desist order to 440 prohibit any person from engaging in the business of contracting 441 who does not hold the required certification or registration for 442 the work being performed under this part. 443 Section 10.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 444 made by this act to section 489.105, Florida Statutes, in 445 references thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (1), paragraphs 446 (a) and (b) of subsection (2), and paragraphs (a), (d), and (e) 447 of subsection (4) of section 489.117, Florida Statutes, are 448 reenacted to read: 449 489.117âRegistration; specialty contractors.â 450 (1)(a)âA person engaged in the business of a contractor as 451 defined in s. 489.105(3)(a)-(o) must be registered before 452 engaging in business as a contractor in this state, unless he or 453 she is certified. Except as provided in paragraph (2)(b), to be 454 initially registered, the applicant must submit the required fee 455 and file evidence of successful compliance with the local 456 examination and licensing requirements, if any, in the area for 457 which registration is desired. An examination is not required 458 for registration. 459 (2)(a)âExcept as provided in paragraph (b), the board may 460 not issue a new registration after July 1, 1993, based on any 461 certificate of competency or license for a category of 462 contractor defined in s. 489.105(3)(a)-(o) which is issued by a 463 municipal or county government that does not exercise 464 disciplinary control and oversight over such locally licensed 465 contractors, including forwarding a recommended order in each 466 action to the board as provided in s. 489.131(7). For purposes 467 of this subsection and s. 489.131(10), the board shall determine 468 the adequacy of such disciplinary control by reviewing the local 469 governmentâs ability to process and investigate complaints and 470 to take disciplinary action against locally licensed 471 contractors. 472 (b)âThe board shall issue a registration to an eligible 473 applicant to engage in the business of a contractor in a 474 specified local jurisdiction, provided each of the following 475 conditions are satisfied: 476 1.âThe applicant held, in any local jurisdiction in this 477 state during 2021, 2022, or 2023, a certificate of registration 478 issued by the state or a local license issued by a local 479 jurisdiction to perform work in a category of contractor defined 480 in s. 489.105(3)(a)-(o). 481 2.âThe applicant submits all of the following to the board: 482 a.âEvidence of the certificate of registration or local 483 license held by the applicant as required by subparagraph 1. 484 b.âEvidence that the specified local jurisdiction does not 485 have a license type available for the category of work for which 486 the applicant was issued a certificate of registration or local 487 license during 2021, 2022, or 2023, such as a notification on 488 the website of the local jurisdiction or an e-mail or letter 489 from the office of the local building official or local building 490 department stating that such license type is not available in 491 that local jurisdiction. 492 c.âEvidence that the applicant has submitted the required 493 fee. 494 d.âEvidence of compliance with the insurance and financial 495 responsibility requirements of s. 489.115(5). 496 497 An examination is not required for an applicant seeking a 498 registration under this paragraph. 499 (4)(a)1.âA person whose job scope does not substantially 500 correspond to either the job scope of one of the contractor 501 categories defined in s. 489.105(3)(a)-(o), or the job scope of 502 one of the certified specialty contractor categories established 503 by board rule, is not required to register with the board. A 504 local government, as defined in s. 163.211, may not require a 505 person to obtain a license, issued by the local government or 506 the state, for a job scope which does not substantially 507 correspond to the job scope of one of the contractor categories 508 defined in s. 489.105(3)(a)-(o) and (q) or authorized in s. 509 489.1455(1), or the job scope of one of the certified specialty 510 contractor categories established pursuant to s. 489.113(6). A 511 local government may not require a state or local license to 512 obtain a permit for such job scopes. For purposes of this 513 section, job scopes for which a local government may not require 514 a license include, but are not limited to, painting; flooring; 515 cabinetry; interior remodeling when the scope of the project 516 does not include a task for which a state license is required; 517 driveway or tennis court installation; handyman services; 518 decorative stone, tile, marble, granite, or terrazzo 519 installation; plastering; pressure washing; stuccoing; caulking; 520 and canvas awning and ornamental iron installation. 521 2.âA county that includes an area designated as an area of 522 critical state concern under s. 380.05 may offer a license for 523 any job scope which requires a contractor license under this 524 part if the county imposed such a licensing requirement before 525 January 1, 2021. 526 3.âA local government may continue to offer a license for 527 veneer, including aluminum or vinyl gutters, siding, soffit, or 528 fascia; rooftop painting, coating, and cleaning above three 529 stories in height; or fence installation and erection if the 530 local government imposed such a licensing requirement before 531 January 1, 2021. 532 4.âA local government may not require a license as a 533 prerequisite to submit a bid for public works projects if the 534 work to be performed does not require a license under general 535 law. 536 (d)âAny person who is not required to obtain registration 537 or certification pursuant to s. 489.105(3)(d)-(o) may perform 538 contracting services for the construction, remodeling, repair, 539 or improvement of single-family residences, including a 540 townhouse as defined in the Florida Building Code, without 541 obtaining a local license if such person is under the 542 supervision of a certified or registered general, building, or 543 residential contractor. As used in this paragraph, supervision 544 shall not be deemed to require the existence of a direct 545 contract between the certified or registered general, building, 546 or residential contractor and the person performing specialty 547 contracting services. 548 (e)âAny person who is not certified or registered may 549 perform the work of a specialty contractor whose scope of 550 practice is limited to the type of work specified under s. 551 489.105(3)(j), (k), or (l) for the construction, remodeling, 552 repair, or improvement of commercial or residential swimming 553 pools, interactive water features as defined in the Florida 554 Building Code, hot tubs, and spas without obtaining a local 555 license or certification as a specialty contractor if he or she 556 is supervised by a contractor who is certified or registered 557 under s. 489.105(3)(j), (k), or (l); the work is within the 558 scope of the supervising contractorâs license; the supervising 559 contractor is responsible for the work; and the work does not 560 require certification or registration under s. 489.105(3)(d) 561 (i), (m)-(o), or s. 489.505. Such supervision does not require a 562 direct contract between the contractor certified or registered 563 under s. 489.105(3)(j), (k), or (l) and the person performing 564 the work, or for the person performing the work to be an 565 employee of the contractor certified or registered under s. 566 489.105(3)(j), (k), or (l). This paragraph does not limit the 567 exemptions provided in s. 489.103 and may not be construed to 568 expand the scope of a contractor certified or registered under 569 s. 489.105(3)(j), (k), or (l) to provide plumbing or electrical 570 services for which certification or registration is required by 571 this part or part II. 572 Section 11.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 573 made by this act to section 489.105, Florida Statutes, in a 574 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 489.118, Florida 575 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 576 489.118âCertification of registered contractors; 577 grandfathering provisions.âThe board shall, upon receipt of a 578 completed application and appropriate fee, issue a certificate 579 in the appropriate category to any contractor registered under 580 this part who makes application to the board and can show that 581 he or she meets each of the following requirements: 582 (1)âCurrently holds a valid registered local license in one 583 of the contractor categories defined in s. 489.105(3)(a)-(p). 584 Section 12.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 585 made by this act to section 489.105, Florida Statutes, in a 586 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 489.126, Florida 587 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 588 489.126âMoneys received by contractors.â 589 (1)âFor purposes of this section, the term âcontractorâ 590 includes all definitions as set forth in s. 489.105(3), and any 591 person performing or contracting or promising to perform work 592 described therein, without regard to the licensure of the 593 person. 594 Section 13.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 595 made by this act to section 489.105, Florida Statutes, in 596 references thereto, subsections (10) and (11) of section 597 489.131, Florida Statutes, are reenacted to read: 598 489.131âApplicability.â 599 (10)âNo municipal or county government may issue any 600 certificate of competency or license for any contractor defined 601 in s. 489.105(3)(a)-(o) after July 1, 1993, unless such local 602 government exercises disciplinary control and oversight over 603 such locally licensed contractors, including forwarding a 604 recommended order in each action to the board as provided in 605 subsection (7). Each local board that licenses and disciplines 606 contractors must have at least two consumer representatives on 607 that board. If the board has seven or more members, at least 608 three of those members must be consumer representatives. The 609 consumer representative may be any resident of the local 610 jurisdiction who is not, and has never been, a member or 611 practitioner of a profession regulated by the board or a member 612 of any closely related profession. 613 (11)âAny municipal or county government which enters or has 614 in place a reciprocal agreement which accepts a certificate of 615 competency or license issued by another municipal or county 616 government in lieu of its own certificate of competency or 617 license allowing contractors defined in s. 489.105(3)(a)-(o), 618 shall file a certified copy of such agreement with the board not 619 later than 60 days after July 1, 1993, or 30 days after the 620 effective date of such agreement. 621 Section 14.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 622 made by this act to section 489.105, Florida Statutes, in a 623 reference thereto, paragraph (d) of subsection (1) of section 624 489.1402, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 625 489.1402âHomeownersâ Construction Recovery Fund; 626 definitions.â 627 (1)âThe following definitions apply to ss. 489.140-489.144: 628 (d)ââContractorâ means a Division I or Division II 629 contractor performing his or her respective services described 630 in s. 489.105(3). 631 Section 15.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 632 made by this act to section 489.105, Florida Statutes, in a 633 reference thereto, paragraph (f) of subsection (2) of section 634 489.141, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 635 489.141âConditions for recovery; eligibility.â 636 (2)âA claimant is not qualified to make a claim for 637 recovery from the recovery fund if: 638 (f)âThe claimant had entered into a contract with a 639 licensee to perform a scope of work described in s. 640 489.105(3)(d)-(q) before July 1, 2016. 641 Section 16.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 642 made by this act to section 489.105, Florida Statutes, in a 643 reference thereto, section 553.998, Florida Statutes, is 644 reenacted to read: 645 553.998âCompliance.âAll ratings must be determined using 646 tools and procedures developed by the systems recognized under 647 this part and must be certified by the rater as accurate and 648 correct and in compliance with procedures of the system under 649 which the rater is certified. The local enforcement agency shall 650 accept duct and air infiltration tests conducted in accordance 651 with the Florida Building Code, 5th Edition (2014) Energy 652 Conservation, by individuals as defined in s. 553.993(5) or (7) 653 or individuals licensed as set forth in s. 489.105(3)(f), (g), 654 or (i). The local enforcement agency may accept inspections in 655 whole or in part by individuals as defined in s. 553.993(5) or 656 (7). 657 Section 17.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 658 made by this act to section 489.115, Florida Statutes, in a 659 reference thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (4) of section 660 489.517, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 661 489.517âRenewal of certificate or registration; continuing 662 education.â 663 (4)(a)âIf a certificateholder or registrant holds a license 664 under both this part and part I and is required to have 665 continuing education courses under s. 489.115(4)(b)1., the 666 certificateholder or registrant may apply those course hours for 667 workersâ compensation, workplace safety, and business practices 668 obtained under part I to the requirements under this part. 669 Section 18.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 670 made by this act to section 489.115, Florida Statutes, in a 671 reference thereto, subsection (18) of section 553.79, Florida 672 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 673 553.79âPermits; applications; issuance; inspections.â 674 (18)âCertifications by contractors authorized under the 675 provisions of s. 489.115(4)(b) shall be considered equivalent to 676 sealed plans and specifications by a person licensed under 677 chapter 471 or chapter 481 by local enforcement agencies for 678 plans review for permitting purposes relating to compliance with 679 the wind resistance provisions of the code or alternate 680 methodologies approved by the commission for one and two family 681 dwellings. Local enforcement agencies may rely upon such 682 certification by contractors that the plans and specifications 683 submitted conform to the requirements of the code for wind 684 resistance. Upon good cause shown, local government code 685 enforcement agencies may accept or reject plans sealed by 686 persons licensed under chapter 471, chapter 481, or chapter 489. 687 A truss-placement plan is not required to be signed and sealed 688 by an engineer or architect unless prepared by an engineer or 689 architect or specifically required by the Florida Building Code. 690 Section 19.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.